Missouri, session 2026, SB1616.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 208.009, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 208.009,
to read as follows:
208.009. 1. No individual who is not a United States
citizen or national of the United States shall be eligible
to receive food assistance through the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), unless that individual
meets the definition of an eligible alien pursuant to 7
U.S.C. 2015(f) and meets the definition of a qualified alien
pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1641(b).
2. No individual who is not a United States citizen or
national of the United States shall be eligible to receive
medical assistance through MO HealthNet, unless that
individual meets the definition of an eligible alien
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396b(v) and meets the definition of a
qualified alien pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1641(b).
3. No alien unlawfully present in the United States
shall receive any state or local public benefit, except for
state or local public benefits that may be offered under 8
U.S.C. 1621(b). Nothing in this section shall be construed
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1616 2
to prohibit the rendering of emergency medical care,
prenatal care, services offering alternatives to abortion,
emergency assistance, or legal assistance to any person.
[2.] 4. As used in this section, "public benefit"
means any grant, contract, or loan provided by an agency of
state or local government; or any retirement, welfare,
health, disability, housing, or food assistance benefit
under which payments, assistance, credits, or reduced rates
or fees are provided. The term "public benefit" shall not
include postsecondary education public benefits as defined
in section 173.1110, any municipal permit, or contracts or
agreements between public utility providers and their
customers or unemployment benefits payable under chapter
288. The unemployment compensation program shall verify the
lawful presence of an alien for the purpose of determining
eligibility for benefits in accordance with its own
procedures.
[3.] 5. In addition to providing proof of other
eligibility requirements, at the time of application for any
state or local public benefit, an applicant [who is eighteen
years of age or older] shall provide affirmative proof [that
the applicant is] they are a United States citizen [or a
permanent resident of the United States or is lawfully
present in the United States], a United States national, or
an alien with eligible immigration status for public
benefits. Such affirmative proof shall include documentary
evidence recognized by the department of revenue when
processing an application for a driver's license, a Missouri
driver's license, as well as any document issued by the
federal government that confirms an alien's lawful presence
in the United States[. In processing applications for
public benefits, an employee of an agency of state or local

SB 1616 3
government shall not inquire about the legal status of a
custodial parent or guardian applying for a public benefit
on behalf of his or her dependent child who is a citizen or
permanent resident of the United States] and eligible alien
status for public benefits.
[4.] 6. An applicant who cannot provide the proof
required under this section at the time of application may
alternatively sign an affidavit under oath, attesting to
either United States citizenship or classification by the
United States as an alien lawfully admitted [for permanent
residence] that is eligible for public benefits, in order to
receive temporary benefits or a temporary identification
document as provided in this section. The affidavit shall
be on or consistent with forms prepared by the state or
local government agency administering the state or local
public benefits and shall include the applicant's Social
Security number or any applicable federal identification
number and an explanation of the penalties under state law
for obtaining public assistance benefits fraudulently.
[5.] 7. (1) An applicant who has provided the sworn
affidavit required under subsection [4] 6 of this section is
eligible to receive temporary public benefits as follows:
[(1)] (a) For the minimum period required under
federal law, or if no minimum period is established under
federal law, for ninety days or until such time that it is
determined that the applicant is not lawfully present in the
United States or otherwise ineligible for public benefits
due to immigration status, whichever is earlier; or
[(2)] (b) Indefinitely if the applicant provides a
copy of a completed application for a birth certificate that
is pending in Missouri or some other state. An extension
granted under this subsection shall terminate upon the

SB 1616 4
applicant's receipt of a birth certificate or a
determination that a birth certificate does not exist
because the applicant is not a United States citizen.
(2) Failure to submit acceptable documentation
establishing United States citizenship, United States
national status, or alien status eligible for such public
benefits within the temporary eligibility period shall
result in denial or termination of public benefits.
(3) No additional period of eligibility for temporary
benefits shall be granted to any applicant who has
previously been denied public benefits at any time due to a
failure to verify United States citizenship, United States
national status, or alien status eligible for such public
benefits.
[6.] 8. An applicant who is an alien shall not receive
any state or local public benefit unless the alien's lawful
presence in the United States is first verified by the
federal government. State and local agencies administering
100 public benefits in this state shall cooperate with the
101 United States Department of Homeland Security in achieving
102 verification of an alien's lawful presence in the United
103 States in furtherance of this section. The system utilized
104 [may] shall include, but not be limited to, the Systematic
105 Alien Verification for Entitlements Program operated by the
106 United States Department of Homeland Security. [After an
107 applicant's lawful presence in the United States has been
108 verified through the Systematic Alien Verification for
109 Entitlements Program, no additional verification is required
110 within the same agency of the state or local government.]
111 9. A match through any electronic or data verification
112 system shall not, by itself, be accepted as proof of
113 identity. Every applicant for public benefits shall be

SB 1616 5
114 required to provide documentary proof of United States
115 citizenship, United States national status, or alien status
116 eligible for such public benefits pursuant to subsection 5
117 of this section.
118 [7.] 10. The provisions of this section shall not be
119 construed to require any nonprofit organization duly
120 registered with the Internal Revenue Service to enforce the
121 provisions of this section, nor does it prohibit such an
122 organization from providing aid.
123 [8.] 11. Any agency that administers public benefits
124 shall provide assistance in obtaining appropriate
125 documentation to persons applying for public benefits who
126 sign the affidavit required by subsection [4] 6 of this
127 section stating they are eligible for such benefits but lack
128 the documents required under subsection [3] 5 of this
129 section.
130 12. The MO HealthNet division shall require a field
131 for citizenship or immigration status on all presumptive
132 eligibility applications. The division shall require
133 hospitals, clinics, and other qualified entities authorized
134 to conduct presumptive eligibility determinations to collect
135 and transmit attestations of citizenship or eligible
136 immigration status to the division. No presumptive
137 eligibility application shall be approved unless the
138 applicant certifies that they are a United States citizen,
139 United States national, or alien with eligible immigration
140 status for MO HealthNet.
141 13. Any agency that administers public benefits shall
142 verify that the applicant or enrollee of that public benefit
143 is a United States citizen, United States national, or an
144 eligible alien for such public benefit through the
145 Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program

SB 1616 6
146 operated by the United States Department of Homeland
147 Security and any other verification system at the time of
148 application, at each eligibility redetermination, and
149 whenever information is received indicating a change in
150 circumstances affecting eligibility related to citizenship
151 or immigration status.
152 (1) If verification confirms that an applicant or
153 enrollee is not lawfully present in the United States or no
154 longer qualifies pursuant to subsections 1, 2, or 3 of this
155 section, or any successor provision of state and federal
156 law, the agency that administers that public benefit shall
157 immediately terminate future benefits and initiate
158 disenrollment, except as otherwise permitted for temporary
159 benefits under subsection 6 of this section.
160 (2) If any agency that administers public benefits is
161 unable to determine an applicant's or enrollee's lawful
162 presence after a Systematic Alien Verification for
163 Entitlements Program query or other authorized verification,
164 the agency shall immediately suspend approval or
165 continuation of benefits and refer the case to the United
166 States Department of Homeland Security or other appropriate
167 federal agency for investigation and enforcement action. No
168 public benefits shall be paid or continued unless and until
169 lawful presence is conclusively verified, except as
170 otherwise permitted for temporary benefits under subsection
171 6 of this section.
172 (3) The appropriate agency for referral for an
173 applicant or enrollee for whom they were unable to verify
174 lawful presence shall include, but not be limited to, the
175 United States Department of Agriculture.
176 14. When administering SNAP benefits, the department
177 of social services shall:

SB 1616 7
178 (1) Consider the entire income and financial resources
179 of any individual rendered ineligible to receive SNAP
180 benefits under subsection 1 of this section when determining
181 the eligibility and benefit allotment of the household of
182 which such individual is a member; and
183 (2) Notwithstanding any options provided under 7 CFR
184 Section 273.11(c)(3), not prorate or exclude the income or
185 financial resources of ineligible individuals under
186 subsection 1 of this section. All such income and resources
187 shall be fully considered.
✓